Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2230
Constables; bond; approval; amount.

Constables in county court shall give bond in the amount of five thousand dollars signed by two or more sureties who shall each qualify in twice the amount of the bond, or by some responsible surety or bonding company authorized by law to execute surety bonds in this state, to be approved by the presiding judge of the district court of the county to be conditioned upon the faithful discharge of his or her duties as constable.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 181, p. 325;

C.S.1929, § 22-1511;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,182;

Laws 1971, LB 959, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,182;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 44;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-5,105.